apertium-sme-smj.smj.lexc
LEXICON TSIBTSA !attr =
 +A+Attr:%>X3 ATTR ;
! +A:%>X3 VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
 +A+Sg+Nom:%>X3 K ;
 +A:%>X5 OTH-ODDCASE ;
 +A:%>X5 ABBO/AMOS ;
 +A+Der2+Der/at+Adv:%>X5it K ;
 +A:%>X5 ODDCmp ;


LEXICON IENNILS !no comparatives
 +A: VUOHTA ;
 +A:%> N-ODDCASE ;
 +A:%> OTH-ODDCASE ;
 +A: NAMÁK ;
 +A:%> R ;

LEXICON GÅNTSAS
 +A+Attr:%>X3 ATTR ;
! +A:%>X3 VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
 +A:%>X3 N-ODDCASE ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
 +A:%>X5 OTH-ODDCASE ;
 +A:%>X5 ABBO/AMOS ;
 +A+Der2+Der/at+Adv:%>X5it K ;
 +A:%>X5 ODDCmp ;

LEXICON DABÁR !like BASSTEL but with CG
 +A+Attr:%>Q1is ATTR ;
! +A:%>Q1is VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
 +A:%>Q1 VUOHTA ;
 +A:%>Q1 N-ODDCASE ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
 +A:%> OTH-ODDCASE ;
 +A:%> ABBO/AMOS ;
 +A+Der2+Der/at+Adv:%>it K ;
 +A+SgNomCmp:%>Q1 R ;
 +A:%> ODDCmp ;

LEXICON SNÁVES    !snáves:snávvas-
 +A+Attr:es%> ATTR ;
! +A:es VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
 +A:es%> N-ODDCASE ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
 +A:vas%>X5 OTH-ODDCASE ;
 +A:vas%>X5 ABBO/AMOS ;
 +A+Der2+Der/at+Adv:vas%>X5it K ;
 +A:vas%>X5 ODDCmp ;




! Contracted stems
! ----------------

LEXICON SÁDNES ! attr =
 +A+Attr:%>Q1s ATTR ;
! +A:%>Q1s VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
 +A+Sg+Nom:%>Q1s K ;
 +A:%>X4 ILL-EVENCASE ;
 +A:%>X4 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:%>X4 PxV ; !
 +A+Ess:%>X4n K ;
 +A:%>X4 BU/MUS ;
 +A+Der2+Der/at+Adv:%>X4t K ;
 +A+SgGenCmp:%>X4 R ;
 +A+PlGenCmp:%>X4j R ;


LEXICON GOAVSOS  !attr =
 +A+Attr:%>Q3s ATTR ;
! +A:%>Q3s VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
 +A+Sg+Nom:%>Q3s K ;
 +A:%>X4 ILL-EVENCASE ;
 +A:%>X4 N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:%>X4 PxV ; !
 +A+Ess:%>X4n K ;
 +A:%>X4 BU/MUS ;
 +A+Der2+Der/at+Adv:%>X4t K ;
 +A+SgGenCmp:%>X4 R ;
 +A+PlGenCmp:%>X4j R ;


LEXICON SUVRES  !attr suvra
 +A+Attr:a%>Q1 ATTR ;
! +A:a%>Q1 VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
 +A:e%>Q1s VUOHTA ;
 +A+Sg+Nom:e%>Q1s K ;
 +A:á%> ILL-EVENCASE ;
 +A:á%> N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+Use/Ped:á%> PxV ; !
 +A+Ess:á%>n K ;
 +A:á%> BU/MUS ;
 +A+Der2+Der/at+Adv:á%>t K ;
 +A+SgNomCmp:e%>Q1s R ;
 +A+SgGenCmp:á%> R ;
 +A+PlGenCmp:á%>j R ;

LEXICON RÁDAS !rádas:ráddasa
 +A+Attr:as%> ATTR ;
! +A:as%> VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
 +A:as%> N-ODDCASE ; ! no pointer to E-ODDCASE, as adjs have no short Ess
 +A:das%> OTH-ODDCASE ;
 +A:das%> ABBO/AMOS ;
 +A+Der2+Der/at+Adv:das%>it K ;
 +A:das%> ODDCmp ;





! Comparation
! -----------

LEXICON BU/MUS ! even-syll adjectives
 +Comp: BUStem ;
 +Superl:muss BUOREMUS ;
 +Comp+Der2+Der/at+Adv:but K ;
 +Superl+Der2+Der/at+Adv:musá%>t K ;
 +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom:bu»sj%> K ;
 +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+Sg+Attr:bu»sj%> ATTR ;
 +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin:bu»dtja%> CompSup-EVEN ;
 +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+Der2+Der/at+Adv:bu»ttja%>t K ;


LEXICON ABBO/AMOS ! odd-syll adjectives
 +Comp+Sg+Nom:ap%> K ;
 +Comp+Sg+Nom:up%> K ;
 +Comp+Sg+Nom:abbo%> K ;
 +Comp+Sg+Nom:ubbo%> K ;
 +Comp+Attr:ap%> ATTR ;
 +Comp+Attr:up%> ATTR ;
 +Comp: ABBO ;
 +Superl: AMOS ;
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv+Comp:appo%>t K ;
 +Superl+Der2+Der/at+Adv:abmus%>it K ;
 +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom:appu»sj%> K ;
 +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+Sg+Attr:appu»sj%> ATTR ;
 +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin:appu»tj%> CompSup-ODDCASE ;
 +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+Der2+Der/at+Adv:appu»tj%>it K ;
 +Comp+Der2+Der/at+Adv:uppo%>t K ;
 +Superl+Der2+Der/at+Adv:ubmus%>it K ;
 +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom:uppu»sj%> K ;
 +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+Sg+Attr:uppu»sj%> ATTR ;
 +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin:uppu»tj%> CompSup-ODDCASE ;
 +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+Der2+Der/at+Adv:uppu»tj%>it K ;
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv+Comp+Use/Sub:æppo%>t K ; !
 +Superl+Der2+Der/at+Adv+Use/Sub:ebmus%>it K ; !
 +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+Use/Sub:eppu»tj%> CompSup-ODDCASE ; !
 +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+Der2+Der/at+Adv+Use/Sub:eppu»tj%>it K ; !




! Comparative
! -----------

LEXICON BUStem
 +Attr:p ATTR ;
 +Sg+Nom:p K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Ped:bu%> PxV ; ! !
 +Sg+Gen:bu K ;
 +Sg+Abe:bu#dagi K ;
 +Sg+Abe:bu#dagá K ;
 +Sg+Abe:bu#tagá K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Ped:bu%> PxV ; ! !
 +Sg+Acc:buv K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Ped:bu%> PxV ; ! !
 +Sg+Ill:buj K ;
 +Sg+Ine:bun K ;
 +Sg+Ine+Use/Marg+Use/Ped:bun%> PxCs ; ! !
 +Sg+Ela:bus K ;
 +Sg+Ela+Use/Marg+Use/Ped:bust%> PxCs ; ! !
 +Sg+Com:bujn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:bujna K ; !
 +Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Use/Ped:bujn%> PxCs ; ! !
 +Ess:bun K ;
 +Pl+Nom:bu K ;
 +Pl+Gen:buj K ;
 +Pl+Abe:buj#dagi K ;
 +Pl+Abe:buj#dagá K ;
 +Pl+Abe:buj#tagá K ;
 +Pl+Acc:bujt K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Ped:bujd%> PxCs ; ! !
 +Pl+Ill:bujda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:bujn K ;
 +Pl+Ine+Use/Marg+Use/Ped:bujn%> PxCs ; ! !
 +Pl+Ela:bujs K ;
 +Pl+Ela+Use/Marg+Use/Ped:bujst%> PxCs ; ! !
 +Pl+Com:buj K ;

LEXICON ABBO
 +Sg+Nom:abbo%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen:appo%> K ;
 +Sg+Abe:appo%>#dagi K ;
 +Sg+Abe:appo%>#dagá K ;
 +Sg+Abe:appo%>#tagá K ;
 +Sg+Acc:appo%>v K ;
 +Sg+Ill:abbu%>j K ;
 +Sg+Ine:appo%>n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:appo%>s K ;
 +Sg+Com:appu%>jn K ;
 +Sg+Com:appo%>jn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:appu%>jna K ; !
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:appo%>jna K ; !
 +Ess:abbo%>n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:appo%> K ;
 +Pl+Gen:appo%>j K ;
 +Pl+Abe:appo%>j#dagi K ;
 +Pl+Abe:appo%>j#dagá K ;
 +Pl+Abe:appo%>j#tagá K ;
 +Pl+Acc:appo%>jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:appo%>jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:appo%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:appo%>js K ;
 +Pl+Com:appo%>j K ;
 +Sg+Nom:ubbo%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen:uppo%> K ;
 +Sg+Abe:uppo%>#dagi K ;
 +Sg+Abe:uppo%>#dagá K ;
 +Sg+Abe:uppo%>#tagá K ;
 +Sg+Acc:uppo%>v K ;
 +Sg+Ill:ubbu%>j K ;
 +Sg+Ine:uppo%>n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:uppo%>s K ;
 +Sg+Com:uppu%>jn K ;
 +Sg+Com:uppo%>jn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:uppu%>jna K ; !
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:uppo%>jna K ; !
 +Ess:ubbo%>n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:uppo%> K ;
 +Pl+Gen:uppo%>j K ;
 +Pl+Abe:uppo%>j#dagi K ;
 +Pl+Abe:uppo%>j#dagá K ;
 +Pl+Abe:uppo%>j#tagá K ;
 +Pl+Acc:uppo%>jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:uppo%>jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:uppo%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:uppo%>js K ;
 +Pl+Com:uppo%>j K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/Sub:æppo%>#dagi K ; !
 +Sg+Abe+Use/Sub:æppo%>#dagá K ; !
 +Sg+Abe+Use/Sub:æppo%>#tagá K ; !
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:æppo%>v K ; !
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:æbbu%>j K ; !
 +Sg+Ine+Use/Sub:æppo%>n K ; !
 +Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:æppo%>s K ; !
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:eppu%>jn K ; !
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:æppo%>jn K ; !
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:eppu%>jna K ; !
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:æppo%>jna K ; !
 +Ess+Use/Sub:æbbo%>n K ; !
 +Pl+Abe+Use/Sub:æppo%>j#dagi K ; !
 +Pl+Abe+Use/Sub:æppo%>j#dagá K ; !
 +Pl+Abe+Use/Sub:æppo%>j#tagá K ; !
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:æppo%>jt K ; !
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:æppo%>jda K ; !
 +Pl+Ine+Use/Sub:æppo%>jn K ; !
 +Pl+Ela+Use/Sub:æppo%>js K ; !
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:æppo%>j K ; !

LEXICON AdjectiveRoot
sáltes:sállte SÁDNES ;
 suvres+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:suvrr SUVRES ; !
 vijses+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:vijsse SÁDNES ; !
